Utah statutes.
59-13-304.   Inspection of clean fuel vehicles.

(1)  The commission may require each clean fuel vehicle to be inspected for safe operation.

(2)  Each clean fuel vehicle shall be equipped with an approved and properly installed carburetion system if it is powered by a fuel that is gaseous at standard atmospheric conditions.

